Washington statutes.
RCW 36.47.010

Declaration of necessity.

The necessity and the desirability of coordinating the administrative programs of all of the counties in this state is recognized by this chapter.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.47.010. Prior: 1959 c 130 s 1.]